New York, session 2025-2026, S7044.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the department of civil service shall 2 prepare a report on civil service titles requiring licensure under arti- 3 cle 163 of the education law. Such report shall include, but not be 4 limited to: 5 (a) an identification of all titles in the civil service which require 6 an appointee to possess a license and current registration as a mental 7 health practitioner in one or more professions under article 163 of the 8 education law, and the description of such titles; 9 (b) the salary grade of such titles and a determination of whether, 10 based on board certification requirements, duties, and education and 11 experience levels, such salary grades are appropriate; and 12 (c) a determination as to whether such current civil service titles 13 and career ladders are appropriate. 14 § 2. The commissioner is authorized to conduct this report in conjunc- 15 tion with any other reports being developed by the department of civil 16 service. The commissioner shall submit such report to the governor, the 17 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the 18 minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the assembly 19 on or before December 31, 2027. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11326-01-5